dictsource/ga_rules
.group oi
        oi         O
  _L15) oi (+      @'I
     _) oi (b      I
        oi (de     I
        oi (di     I
        oi (c_     I
     h) oi (b      I
     _) oi (r      I
     r) oi         I
     l) oi (n      I
     f) oi (lC     aI
     l) oi (g      I
    fh) oi (lC     aI
     s) oi (ls     aI#
     c) oi (c      aI#
        oi (nnío   @
        oi (mis    @
        ois (++    O#S
     n) ois (_++   IS
        oill (+    w'i:l
     _) oi (leá    'I
        oidh       aI
        oir (_     'ERR
     l) oic (_     Ek
   _sc) oi (r      O
        oigh (ea   aI
        oighn      aIXn
        oinse (_   @i:nS@
        oi (nte    @i:

.group p
        p          p         // broad
        ph         f         // broad
        p (L22     p;        // slender
        ph (L20    f;        // slender
?1 _b_) p (@ 
     _) príomh (@P6 pR,i:v
     _) phríomh (@P7 fR,i:v



.group r
        r          r         // broad
   L01) r          R         // slender
        r (L01     R
     _) r (L01     r
  L12i) r (e_      Z
  L12i) r (t_      Z
        rr         R
        rg         r@g
        rgh        rQ"
   L01) rg         R@g       // slender
        r (bh      r@
     s) r (A       R
     _) ramh       raU
     _) réamh (@P5 r,e:v


.group s
        s          s         // broad
   L01) s          S         // slender
        s (L01     S         // slender
        s (CL01    S
        s (CCL01   S         // slender
        s (pCé     s         // broad
?1 _t_) s (@ 
        sh         h
        sh (CL01   h
        sh (L01    h;
        s (lL01    S
    _') s (_       s         // 's in poems etc
     _) sain (@P4  s,an
     _) sean (@@P4 S,an


.group t
        t          t[        // broad
   L01) t          c         // slender
        t (í++n    tS        // slender
        t (eo++    tS
        t (L01     c         // slender
?1   _) t (_L01    c
  L01C) t          tS        // slender after consonant
        t (CL01    tS        // slender with following consonant before vowels
?1 _d_) t (@ 
        th         h
        th (L01    h;
  L01C) th         h
     _) ts         t[        // eclipsis broad
     _) ts (L01    t;        // eclipsis slender
?1   _) t (_s      t[        // eclipsis broad
?1   _) t (_sL01   t;        // eclipsis slender
   L01) th         h
        taine (_   t[In%E
    ao) th (_ 
        thne (_    h@nE
     A) th (_                // silent th at word end
     c) th (e_     ih        // guta cúnta
     K) th (as_    @h        // guta cúnta


.group u
        u          U#
        ua         u@
        ua (_      u:@
        uai        u@
        uai (g     ui
        uai (d     ui
        uainn      u:iN
        uá         u:'A:
        ui         I

        uinn (_    'i:n
        uinti      U#'i:ntI
    _b) uí         wi:
   _bh) uí         wi:
     g) uí         wi:
    gh) uí         wi:
        umh        u:
   L03) ui         @I
    _d) u (l_      O#
     g) ui (gh_    @i:
    gh) ui (gh_    @i:
        uí         i:
        uíomh      'i:@vv

        uachai     'ux@
     _) uimhir (C@P6 ,IvIR
        uibhne (_  @'i:n;E
        uibhneach (_ @'i:n@x


.group ú
        ú          u:
        únmh       u:nv

        úi         u:
        úinn (_    u:IN
        úibh (_    u:Iv
        úi (g      u:i



// words which contain j k q v w x y z, speak as English
.group j
        j          _^_EN

.group k
        k          _^_EN

.group q
        q          _^_EN

.group v
        v          v
        v (L22     vj // slender
   L22) v          vj // slender
        véarsa     vje:rs@

.group w
        w          _^_EN

.group x
        x          _^_EN

.group y
        y          _^_EN

.group z
        z          _^_EN
